Delaware, session 153, SB135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Part VI, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Chapter 64B. Joint Grants-in-Aid Committee. Â§ 6401B. Joint Grants-in-Aid Committee created; purpose. (a) There is created a Joint Grants-in-aid Committee (âCommitteeâ). (b) The Committeeâs purpose is to do all of the following: (1) Review requests for grants-in-aid made to the Joint Finance Committee. (2) Draft a recommended grants-in-aid bill for the Joint Finance Committee. Â§ 6402B. Membership; Chair and Vice Chair. (a) The Committee is composed of the following members: (1) Three members of the Senate, appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, not more than 2 of whom may be from the same political party. (2) Three members of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, not more than 2 of whom may be from the same political party. (b)(1) In odd-numbered years, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall appoint 1 of the members appointed under paragraph (a)(1) of this section as Chair and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint 1 of the members appointed under paragraph (b)(2) of this section as Vice Chair. (3) In even-numbered years, the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint 1 of the members appointed under paragraph (b)(2) of this section as Chair and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall appoint 1 of the members appointed under paragraph (b)(1) of this section as Vice Chair. Â§ 6403B. Duties and powers. (a) The Committee shall do all of the following: (1) Review the performance, financial stability, financial controls, audits, and efficiency of an applicant for a grant-in-aid. (2) Require itemized disclosure of all State appropriations and other revenues received by an applicant from other government entities. (3) Require itemized disclosure of any grants received by the applicant. (4) Require a summary of donations from other sources to the applicant. (5) Review requests for grants-in-aid made to the Joint Finance Committee. (6) Draft a recommended grants-in-aid bill for the Joint Finance Committee. (b) The Committee may require an applicant for a grant-in-aid to provide other financial documents the Committee determines to be relevant to the Committeeâs review of the applicant. Â§ 6404B. Staffing. The Controller Generalâs Office shall provide staffing for the Committee. Section 2. Amend Â§ 710, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 710. Compensation of Lieutenant Governor and members of General Assembly. (c) A member of the Senate or the House of Representatives who is elected or appointed to any of the following positions is to receive, while serving in the position, additional yearly compensation as follows: (11) Chair and Vice Chair of the Joint Legislative Oversight and Sunset Committee, $4,670. (12) Members of the Joint Legislative Oversight and Sunset Committee, $3,929. (13) Chair and Vice Chair of the Joint Grants-in-Aid Committee, $4,670. (14) Members of the Joint Grants-in-Aid Committee, $3,929. Section 3. The Chair and Vice Chair of the Joint Grants-in-Aid Committee (âCommitteeâ) created by this Act, in collaboration with the Controller General, shall develop procedures to guide the Committeeâs review of entities that receive a grant-in-aid in the annual grants-in-aid act and the Committeeâs recommendations for dissemination of grants-in-aid funds to an applicant. By February 1, 2026, the Chair and Vice-Chair shall submit the procedures to the Chair and Vice Chair of the Joint Finance Committee for approval.